Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-155
Personal property to credit of inmate or patient; claim; failure to assert; sale; disposition of money.

Upon the failure to assert a claim for personal property within two years as prescribed by section 83-153, the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Correctional Services, or the Department of Veterans' Affairs shall sell the property, either with or without notice at either public or private sale, and shall place the proceeds of such sale in the special fund provided for by section 83-154.

Laws 1953, c. 352, § 3, p. 1128;

Laws 1973, LB 563, § 36;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 918;

Laws 2018, LB827, § 6.